Nevada, session 83, AB568.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Nevada System of Higher Education the sum of
$22,441,996 for operational and instructional expenses of the
University of Nevada, Reno.
Sec. 2. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Nevada System of Higher Education the sum of
$23,580,944 for operational and instructional expenses of the
University of Nevada, Las Vegas.
Sec. 3. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Nevada System of Higher Education the sum of
$113,154 for operational and instructional expenses of the
Agricultural Experiment Station.
Sec. 4. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Nevada System of Higher Education the sum of
$277,476 for the Cooperative Extension Service budget account for
operational and instructional expenses of the Cooperative Extension
Service.
Sec. 5. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Nevada System of Higher Education the sum of
$867,708 for the UNLV Law School budget account for operational
and instructional expenses of the William S. Boyd School of Law at
the University of Nevada, Las Vegas.
Sec. 6. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Nevada System of Higher Education the sum of
$2,124,972 for the UNLV Dental School budget account for
operational and instructional expenses of the School of Dental
Medicine at the University of Nevada, Las Vegas.
Sec. 7. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Nevada System of Higher Education the sum of
$1,072,226 for operational and instructional expenses of the Nevada
State University.
Sec. 8. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Nevada System of Higher Education the sum of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
$5,332,632 for operational and instructional expenses of the College
of Southern Nevada.
Sec. 9. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Nevada System of Higher Education the sum of
$408,738 for operational and instructional expenses of Great Basin
College.
Sec. 10. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Nevada System of Higher Education the sum of
$221,370 for operational and instructional expenses of Western
Nevada College.
Sec. 11. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Nevada System of Higher Education the sum of
$1,043,258 for operational and instructional expenses of Truckee
Meadows Community College.
Sec. 12. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Nevada System of Higher Education the sum of $2,976
for the Prison Education Program budget account for operational
and instructional expenses of the Prison Education Program.
Sec. 13. Any remaining balance of the appropriations made by
sections 1 to 12, inclusive, of this act must not be committed for
expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to which the
appropriation is made or any entity to which money from the
appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner, and
any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be spent
for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity to
which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the money
was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the
State General Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 13.5. 1. The Legislature hereby declares its intent that
the appropriations made pursuant to this act are one-time grants of
money intended to sustain the operations of the Nevada System of
Higher Education and the institutions named herein for the duration
of the 2025-2027 biennium.
2. The Legislature hereby urges the Nevada System of Higher
Education, during the 2025-2027 biennium, to seek additional
sources of revenue to ensure that the System is able to pay its
operational and instructional expenses in future biennia.
Sec. 14. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)